District of Columbia statutes.
29-204.01

Conversion authorized.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in this section, by complying with this subchapter, a domestic entity may become:

(1)

A domestic entity of a different type; or

(2)

A foreign entity of a different type if the conversion is authorized by the law of the foreign jurisdiction.

(b)

Except as otherwise provided in this section, by complying with the provisions of this subchapter applicable to foreign entities, a foreign entity may become a domestic entity of a different type if the conversion is authorized by the law of the foreign entity’s jurisdiction of formation.

(c)

If a protected agreement contains a provision that applies to a merger of a domestic entity but does not refer to a conversion, the provision shall apply to a conversion of the entity as if the conversion were a merger until the provision is amended after the effective date of this chapter.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(b)(17), 59 DCR 13171
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “formation” for “organization” in (b).
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.